New York, session 2025-2026, A7483.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 226-a 2 to read as follows: 3 § 226-a. Investigation of police misconduct; towns and villages. The 4 superintendent of state police shall ensure that an investigation is 5 conducted for any accusation of police misconduct filed against a member 6 of law enforcement employed by a town or village. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 8 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10717-01-5